Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.902

Transfer of certain powers, duties, functions, and assets of the department of information services.

(1) The powers, duties, and functions of the department of information services as set forth in RCW * 43.19.791, ** 43.19.794, and ***section 614 of this act are hereby transferred to the department of enterprise services.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of information services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of enterprise services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of information services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the department of enterprise services. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of information services in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the department of enterprise services.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of information services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on October 1, 2011, be transferred and credited to the department of enterprise services.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of information services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of enterprise services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of enterprise services.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of information services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before October 1, 2011.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) All employees of the department of information services engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of enterprise services, are transferred to the department of enterprise services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of enterprise services to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service law.

(7) Unless or until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to RCW 41.80.911:

(a) The portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of information services existing on October 1, 2011, shall be considered appropriate units at the department of enterprise services and will be so certified by the public employment relations commission.

(b) The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of information services existing on October 1, 2011, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representative of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1004.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 43.19.791 was repealed by 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 506.

**(2) RCW 43.19.794 was repealed by 2019 c 132 s 8.

***(3) The reference to section 614 of this act appears to be erroneous. Section 734 of this act, recodified as RCW 43.19.797, was apparently intended. RCW 43.19.797 was subsequently recodified as RCW 39.26.235 pursuant to 2012 c 224 s 28, effective January 1, 2013.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.